Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 7 COLORADO WORKS PROGRAM
26-2-708. Assistance - assessment - individual responsibility contract - waivers for domestic violence - rules.

Subject to the provisions of the federal law, the provisions of this section, and available appropriations, a county department shall perform an assessment for a new participant who is eighteen years of age or older, or who is sixteen years of age or older but has not yet attained the age of eighteen years of age and has not completed high school or successfully completed a high school equivalency examination, as defined in section 22-33-102 (8.5), C.R.S., and is not attending high school or participating in a high school equivalency examination program. The initial assessment must be completed no more than thirty days after the submission of the application for assistance under the works program. Updated assessments may be conducted at the discretion of the county department.

A county department shall develop an individual responsibility contract for a new participant who has been assessed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, within thirty days after completing the initial assessment of the participant as required in subsection (1) of this section, subject to the provisions of the federal law and this section. The IRC shall be limited in scope to matters relating to securing and maintaining training, education, or work. The county department shall seek the input and involvement of the participant when developing the IRC.

The IRC shall contain provisions in bold print at the beginning of the document that notify the participant of the following:

That no individual is legally entitled to any form of assistance under the Colorado works program;

That the IRC is a contract that contains terms and conditions governing the participant's receipt of assistance under the Colorado works program and that nothing in such contract may be deemed to create a legal entitlement to assistance under the Colorado works program;

That the participant's failure to comply with the terms and conditions of the IRC may result in sanctions, including but not limited to the termination of any cash assistance;

For a county that has elected to implement a Colorado works controlled substance abuse control program described in section 26-2-706.6 (7), that the IRC may require the participant to participate in the Colorado works controlled substance abuse control program, based upon the participant's use of a controlled substance, by requiring the participant to take action toward rehabilitation consistent with the recommendations of the assessment pursuant to section 26-2-706.6 (7). The program may be included as a county-defined work activity. The rehabilitation plan may include random drug testing, drug treatment, or other rehabilitation activities. The participant may be subject to any sanctions for nonparticipation in a work activity if the participant fails to meet the requirements of the rehabilitation plan; except that a participant may not be sanctioned for failing to meet the requirements of the rehabilitation plan if services required under the plan are not available, if transportation or child care is not available, or if the costs of the services are prohibitive.

That the applicant or participant shall indicate by signature on the IRC either agreement with the terms and conditions of the IRC or that the applicant or participant requests a county level review of the proposed IRC in accordance with section 26-2-710 (4) on the grounds that the proposed IRC is unreasonable within the context of the county's written policies.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 99, p. 272, § 1, effective April 13, 1999.)

The state board shall establish through rules, after consultation with domestic violence service providers, statewide standards and procedures that:

Require counties to provide notice to all past or present victims of domestic violence as described in the federal law or those at risk of further domestic violence of the referrals required pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (5), the possible waivers pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection (5), and the applicable procedures described in paragraph (e) of this subsection (5);

Require counties to provide for referrals to any available counseling and supportive services to past or present victims of domestic violence as described in the federal law or those at risk of further violence, but the rules shall not obligate a county to pay for any counseling or supportive services to which a participant is referred;

Allow counties upon a showing of good cause, as determined by rules of the state board, to provide waivers from any program requirements, except as provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection (5), that will make it more difficult for an applicant or a participant to escape domestic violence or that would unfairly penalize such individuals who are or have been victimized by such violence or who are at risk of further violence;

Require counties to submit requests for waivers of work requirements to the state department to determine whether good cause exists to grant such waivers;

Require counties to assure the voluntariness and confidentiality of the procedures for identifying eligibility for referrals to supportive services and waivers, the procedures for applying for waivers, and the procedures by which an applicant or a participant who is denied a waiver may appeal such decision.

(5.3) (a) No later than July 1, 2023, the state board shall promulgate rules:

Establishing statewide standards and procedures that require counties to inform and not penalize any applicant or household that demonstrates good cause for an exemption from work requirements, which includes, but is not limited to, an applicant or participant who is:

The head of a single-parent household unit and has a child under one year of age; or

Experiencing hardship, as defined in rules promulgated by the state board; and

Ensuring equal access to TANF services for those exempted who wish to participate on a voluntary basis.

When promulgating rules pursuant to this subsection (5.3), the state board shall consider compliance with the federal law in relation to the calculation of the state's work participation rates specified in the federal law.

(5.5) and (6) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1957, § 9, effective January 1, 2009.)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 1200, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 99:

(1), (2), and (4) amended, p. 272, § 1, effective April 13; (3) amended, p. 658, § 1, effective May 18; (3) amended, p. 1359, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2001:

(5)(d) amended, p. 1173, § 12, effective August 8; (5.5) added, p. 980, § 5, effective August 8.

L. 2008:

(1), (2), (3)(d), (5.5) and (6) amended, p. 1957, § 9, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (SB 14-058), ch. 102, p. 384, § 19, effective April 7.

L. 2022:

(5.3) added, (HB 22-1259), ch. 348, p. 2482, § 5, effective June 3.

Editor's note:

Amendments made to subsection (3) by House Bill 99-1203 and House Bill 99-1017 were harmonized. As a result of the harmonization, subsection (3)(d) contained in House Bill 99-1017 was renumbered on revision as (3)(e).

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1259, see section 1 of chapter 348, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

26-2-708.5. Colorado works controlled substance abuse control program. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 1360, § 2, effective June 3.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1959, § 10, effective January 1, 2009.

26-2-709. Benefits - cash assistance - programs - rules - repeal.

Standard of need - basic cash assistance grant.

The state department shall promulgate rules determining the standard of need for eligibility for a basic cash assistance grant, whether an applicant or participant meets the standard of need, and the amount of the basic cash assistance grant. The state department shall annually review and promulgate rules as necessary to update the standard of need to ensure the standard of need is equitable, promotes economic mobility and self-sufficiency, and reflects the current economic situations in the state. In addition to any other rules necessary for the implementation of this part 7, the state department's rules shall:

Adopt a statewide standard of need for eligibility for a basic cash assistance grant that is not less than the basis for standard of need pursuant to this subsection (1) as it existed on July 1, 2009;

Establish criteria for determining whether an applicant or participant meets the standard of need, including but not limited to what constitutes countable and excludable income for the purposes of eligibility for a basic cash assistance grant;

No later than July 1, 2023, establish the calculation for determining the amount of an eligible applicant's or participant's basic cash assistance grant, which calculation must include an earned income disregard that is applied to the gross countable earned income of an applicant or participant who is employed and a gradual step down of the amount of income disregarded following the initial earned income disregard. The initial earned income disregard and gradual step down must promote work and self-sufficiency, be responsive to family circumstances and need, and benefit the applicant or participant by reducing the unintended economic consequences of becoming employed. The rules promulgated by the state department pursuant to this subsection (1)(a)(III) must not establish an earned income disregard that results in an applicant or participant having fewer financial resources available to the applicant or participant than a similarly situated applicant or participant would have had under the earned income disregard pursuant to section 26-2-709 as it existed on July 1, 2009.

Establish the calculation for determining the amount of the basic cash assistance grant, which calculation shall disregard current child support payments made to a participant pursuant to section 26-2-111 (3)(a.5). However, such payments, with applicable disregards, shall be considered income for purposes of determining eligibility for the grant.

In establishing the calculation for determining the amount of an eligible applicant's or participant's basic cash assistance grant, the state department shall ensure that the amount of the basic cash assistance grant that a participant or applicant receives for the state fiscal year commencing July 1, 2022, is equal to or exceeds one hundred percent of the amount of basic cash assistance in 2021, plus ten percent. For the state fiscal year commencing July 1, 2024, and each state fiscal year thereafter, the amount of basic cash assistance must be equal to or exceed the amount of basic cash assistance for the previous state fiscal year plus a two percent cost of living adjustment or a cost of living adjustment that is equal to the average of the federal social security administration's cost of living adjustment for that fiscal year plus the previous two fiscal years, whichever is greater.

On July 1, 2022, the state treasurer shall transfer twenty-one million five hundred thousand dollars from the economic recovery and relief cash fund, created in section 24-75-228, to the Colorado long-term works reserve to cover any increase in basic cash assistance pursuant to this section above the amount of basic cash assistance in state fiscal year 2021-22.

The money transferred pursuant to subsection (1)(b)(II)(A) of this section must be expended in accordance with section 24-75-226 (4)(d).

This subsection (1)(b)(II) is repealed, effective July 1, 2027.

Beginning state fiscal year 2023-24, and each state fiscal year thereafter, to cover any increase in basic cash assistance pursuant to this section above the total spending of basic cash assistance in state fiscal year 2021-22, the state department shall first expend any money remaining that is transferred to the Colorado long-term works reserve pursuant to subsection (1)(b)(II) of this section. The state department shall then expend money in an amount equal to one-third of the amount necessary to cover any such increase in basic cash assistance from available TANF funds, which must include funds in the Colorado long-term works reserve and the total statewide county TANF reserve, and an amount equal to two-thirds of the amount necessary to cover any such increase in basic cash assistance that the general assembly appropriates to the state department from the state general fund or any other available fund, including the Colorado long-term works reserve, in accordance with section 26-2-721 (5). The state department and counties shall identify an equitable portion of the Colorado long-term works reserve and total statewide county TANF reserve for the implementation of this subsection (1)(b)(III)(A). The general assembly shall appropriate money to the state department for the implementation of this subsection (1)(b)(III)(A).

If the total statewide county TANF reserve falls below fifteen percent of the county block grant amount, the general assembly shall appropriate money from the Colorado long-term works reserve to the county block grant until the balance of the total statewide county TANF reserve exceeds fifteen percent of the county block grant amount or until the Colorado long-term works reserve falls below twenty-five percent of the state block grant amount.

If the Colorado long-term works reserve falls below twenty-five percent of the state block grant amount and the total statewide county TANF reserve exceeds fifteen percent of the county block grant amount, the counties shall fund the TANF program from available TANF funds until the total statewide county TANF reserve falls below fifteen percent of the county block grant amount. Counties are only required to spend available TANF money, including county TANF reserves and the maintenance of effort, for the Colorado works program.

Beginning January 2023, and each January thereafter, the joint budget committee shall at least annually review the balance of the Colorado long-term works reserve and the total statewide county TANF reserve, and, if the joint budget committee determines that the balance of the Colorado long-term works reserve will fall below twenty-five percent of the state block grant amount and the balance of the total statewide county TANF reserve will fall below fifteen percent of the county block grant amount in the current or next state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate money from the state general fund or the unclaimed property trust fund to cover any increase in basic cash assistance above the amount of basic cash assistance in state fiscal year 2021-22 until the balance of the Colorado long-term works reserve exceeds twenty-five percent of the state block grant amount and the total statewide county TANF reserve exceeds fifteen percent of the county block grant amount.

The state department and a county department that receives money from the state department pursuant to this section shall comply with the compliance, reporting, record-keeping, and program evaluation requirements established by the office of state planning and budgeting and the state controller in accordance with section 24-75-226 (5).

Except as otherwise provided in this part 7 and subject to available appropriations, an applicant or participant who meets the eligibility criteria established by the state department pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall receive a basic cash assistance grant in an amount determined by the state department pursuant to paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (1). An increase in the amount of the basic cash assistance grant approved by the state department shall not take effect unless the funding for the increase is included in the annual general appropriation act or a supplemental appropriation act.

Repealed.

Beginning July 1, 2021, and each year thereafter, the joint budget committee of the general assembly shall review the sustainability of the Colorado long-term works reserve created in section 26-2-721.

(1.3)

Redetermination of eligibility for persons receiving cash assistance.

The state board shall promulgate rules that require county departments to perform a redetermination of eligibility for all assistance units receiving cash assistance. Eligibility processes from other public assistance or entitlement programs may be used when redetermining eligibility. When possible, the state board is strongly encouraged to align redetermination timelines with other public assistance or entitlement programs.

(1.5)

Rules concerning cash assistance.

The state department shall promulgate rules as may be necessary to comply with changes in federal regulations relating to the definition of the term "cash assistance".

Other assistance.

Subject to available appropriations, a county department may provide assistance, including but not limited to cash assistance, in addition to the basic cash assistance grant described in subsection (1) of this section that is authorized pursuant to the provisions of the federal law or this section. Such other assistance shall be based upon a participant's assessed needs.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1960, § 11, effective January 1, 2009.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1960, § 11, effective January 1, 2009.)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 1202, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 98:

(2) amended, p. 335, § 1, effective April 17.

L. 99:

(1.5) added, p. 31, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1.5) amended, p. 25, § 2, effective March 10.

L. 2001:

(1)(a) amended, p. 212, § 1, effective March 28.

L. 2002:

(1)(a.5) added, p. 904, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2003:

(1)(a) and (1)(a.5) amended and (1.3) added, p. 802, § 4, effective August 6.

L. 2006:

(1)(b) repealed, p. 593, § 2, effective April 24.

L. 2008:

(1)(a), IP(1)(a.5), (1)(c), (2), and (3) amended, p. 1960, § 11, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2010:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 10-1043), ch. 92, p. 316, § 13, effective April 15; entire section amended, (SB 10-068), ch. 160, p. 551, § 5, effective January 1, 2011.

L. 2013:

(1.3) amended, (HB 13-1055), ch. 10, p. 25, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2015:

(1)(a)(II) and (1)(a)(III) amended and (1)(a)(IV) added, (SB 15-012), ch. 282, p. 1155, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2020:

(1)(d) and (1)(e) added, (SB 20-029), ch. 220, p. 1086, § 2, effective July 2.

L. 2022:

IP(1)(a), (1)(a)(III), (1)(b), and (1.3) amended, (HB 22-1259), ch. 348, p. 2482, § 6, effective June 3; (1)(b)(II)(B) amended, (HB 22-1411), ch. 271, p. 1960, § 16, effective June 3.

26-2-709.5. Exit interviews and follow-up interviews of participants - reporting.

In order to follow the legislative intent declared in section 26-2-702 (1)(a), a county department is strongly encouraged to contact each participant using each method of communication provided by the participant in order to conduct exit and follow-up interviews upon case closure, either in person or by telephone, including participants who are or have been receiving short-term assistance payments pursuant to section 26-2-706.6. The interviews shall be conducted in accordance with state department guidance for the purpose of:

Evaluating the participant's experience with the works program;

Evaluating how well the works program met the participant's needs and assisted the participant in meeting the participant's goals;

Informing the state department of any changes to rules that are needed to improve the participant's experience; and

Providing information to the participant and offering assistance with applications for or continuance of assistance under medicaid, food stamps, the Colorado child care assistance program, the earned income tax credit, or other programs such as welfare-to-work or other county benefits or services.

If the state department, in consultation with counties, identifies additional need for funding to administer the works program, the state department is strongly encouraged to request state general fund money or, if the balance of the state TANF reserve is greater than the mandatory floor, appropriate additional state TANF money to fund counties' administration of the works program.

Beginning January 2023, and each January thereafter, the state department shall submit a report to the house of representatives public and behavioral health and human services committee and the senate health and human services committee, or their successor committees, as part of its "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" presentation required by section 2-7-203, on the effectiveness of the works program. To the extent practicable, the state department may request a county department to provide any information and data that may be necessary to develop the report, including information and data from exit interviews conducted by the county departments pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. Any data used must protect personal identifying information of the participants and the participants' family members. At a minimum, the report must include:

The total number of participants enrolled in the works program in the previous fiscal year, disaggregated by case type, race, and ethnicity;

The total number of participants who exited and re-enrolled in the works program one or more times in the previous fiscal year, disaggregated by case type, race, and ethnicity;

The total number of instances a participant exited and re-enrolled in the works program one or more times in the previous fiscal year, disaggregated by case type, race, and ethnicity;

The total number of months each participant remained enrolled in the works program in the previous fiscal year, disaggregated by case type, race, and ethnicity; and

To the extent practicable, data gathered through surveys and exit interviews with participants in the works program regarding participants' experience with the program, beliefs about the goals of the program, perceptions of how participation in the program contributed to the family goals, reasons for leaving the program, current employment status and wage rate, and supportive services provided and whether those services have been impacted by increases in basic cash assistance.

The state department may review and consider information technology solutions for the implementation of this section.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 654, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2004:

(2) repealed, p. 471, § 2, effective August 4.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 1963, § 12, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1259), ch. 348, p. 2485, § 7, effective June 3.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1259, see section 1 of chapter 348, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

26-2-710. Administrative review.

The state department shall promulgate rules for an administrative review process.

All decisions of the state department shall be binding upon the county department involved and shall be complied with by such county department.

If a participant does not agree with or fails to participate in a program or service identified in the IRC, the participant shall continue to receive the basic cash assistance grant that the participant received at the time the appeal is requested during the pendency of any appeal process.

An applicant or participant who believes the IRC proposed by the county is unreasonable has a right to request a review of the proposed IRC by the county department pursuant to a process designated by the county in its written county policy. If the applicant or participant requests such review, the county shall provide the applicant or participant the opportunity for a county level review by a person not directly involved in the initial determination. The review shall be limited to determining whether the terms of the disputed IRC are reasonable within the context of the county's written policy. The reviewer shall issue a written decision for the county regarding the resolution of the outstanding issues involving the proposed IRC. The time frame for such review shall be specified by the county in its written county policy.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 1203, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 659, § 2, effective May 18.

26-2-711. Works program - sanctions against participants - rules.

The state board shall promulgate rules for the imposition of sanctions affecting the basic cash assistance grant as described in section 26-2-709 (1). The rules must require:

Imposition of sanctions upon a participant who fails, without good cause as determined by the county, to comply with the terms and conditions of his or her IRC;

A reduction in the basic cash assistance grant upon the first imposition of a sanction affecting a basic cash assistance grant, with the amount to be specified in the rules but not to exceed one dollar;

Specific reductions in the basic cash assistance grant for second and subsequent sanctions affecting the basic cash assistance grant;

Imposition of sanctions either in the month following the decision to sanction and in subsequent months thereafter until the full amount of any sanctions have been withheld or, in the event that a participant has appealed the imposition of a sanction, in the month following the final decision of the appeal process and in subsequent months thereafter until the full amount of any sanctions have been withheld.

Nothing in the state board rules promulgated pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall prevent a county from denying the basic cash assistance grant in its entirety to a participant who refuses, as evidenced by an affirmative statement by the participant or demonstrable evidence, to participate in training, education, or work.

The state board rules promulgated pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall establish the period of time that sanctions affecting the basic cash assistance grant shall be in effect and the period of time within which a participant who has been denied the basic cash assistance grant by a county pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) may take action for reinstatement into the works program.

A county shall have the authority to determine and impose sanctions affecting other assistance as described in section 26-2-706.6. The sanctions shall be based upon fair and objective criteria that have been developed and adopted by the county and are consistent with state and federal law.

If a county department elects to suspend payment of child care assistance, it may suspend such assistance in its entirety.

In no event shall a county department impose any sanction on a participant that adversely affects the participant's receipt of food stamps beyond those allowable sanctions provided for in federal regulations and state rules or medical assistance pursuant to the provisions of articles 4, 5, and 6 of title 25.5, C.R.S.

A person shall not be required to participate in work activities if good cause exists as determined by the county.

Good cause does not constitute an exemption from work or time limits. Good cause is, however, a proper basis for not imposing a sanction for nonparticipation in a work activity, and may include, but need not be limited to, participation in a Colorado works controlled substance abuse control program pursuant to section 26-2-706.6 (7).

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1963, § 13, effective January 1, 2009.)

If a participant or an applicant has misrepresented residence to obtain benefits in two or more states at the same time, such person shall be ineligible for benefits under the works program for a period of ten years.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part added, p. 1203, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 99:

(5) amended, p. 1361, § 3, effective June 3.

L. 2006:

(4) amended, p. 2018, § 101, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

IP(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (2), (5)(b), and (6) amended, p. 1963, § 13, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2022:

IP(1)(a), (1)(a)(II), and (1)(a)(III) amended, (HB 22-1259), ch. 348, p. 2486, § 8, effective June 3.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1259, see section 1 of chapter 348, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.